CONTENT_1:

CONTENT_2:

CONTENT_3:

CONTENT_4:
We have incurred net losses in all periods since our inception, and we expect that we will continue to incur net losses for the foreseeable future. We experienced net losses of $126.1 million, $168.5 million&#32;and $458.0 million&#32;for fiscal 2015, fiscal 2016&#32;and fiscal 2017, respectively. As of July&#160;31, 2017, we had an accumulated deficit of $899.8 million. In addition to the investments we expect to continue to make to grow our business, we have also incurred and expect to continue incurring significant additional legal, accounting and other expenses as a newly public company that we did not incur as a private company. If we fail to increase our revenue and manage our expenses, we may not achieve or sustain profitability in the future.
CONTENT_5:
The markets in which we compete are rapidly evolving. Accordingly, our future financial performance will depend in large part on the allocation of spending in traditional IT markets and on our ability to adapt to new market demands. Currently, sales of our solutions are dependent in large part upon replacement of spending in traditional markets, including x86 servers, storage systems and virtualization software. In addition, as we develop new solutions designed to address new market demands, such as the recently announced Nutanix Xi Cloud Services and Nutanix Calm, sales of our solutions will in part be dependent on capturing new spending in these markets, including hybrid cloud services. If these markets experience a shift in customer demand, or if customers in these markets focus their new spending on, or shift their existing spending to, public cloud solutions more quickly or more extensively than expected, our solutions may not compete as effectively, if at all. It is also difficult to predict end-customer demand or adoption rates for our solutions or the future growth of our market.
CONTENT_6:
Traditional IT infrastructure architecture is entrenched in the datacenters of many of our end-customers because of their historical financial investment in existing IT infrastructure architecture and the existing knowledge base and skillsets of IT administrators. As a result, our sales efforts often involve extensive efforts to educate our end-customers as to the benefits and capabilities of our web-scale architecture solutions, particularly as we continue to pursue large organizations as end-customers. If we fail to achieve market acceptance of our solutions, our ability to grow our business and our operating results will be adversely affected.
CONTENT_7:
Our relationships with our OEM partners continue to shift as industry dynamics change, and our OEM partners may be less willing to partner with us as an OEM or otherwise as such shifts occur.&#32;&#32;For example, Dell is not just an OEM partner, but also a competitor of ours, and accounted for over 10% of our total billings in each of fiscal 2016 and fiscal 2017.  In September 2016, EMC Corporation, or EMC, was acquired by Dell. As a result of the acquisition, Dell may be more likely to promote and sell its own solutions, including those from EMC&#8217;s complementary product portfolio, over our products,&#32;or cease selling or promoting our products entirely. Also, Dell holds a majority of outstanding voting power in VMware, and could combine the Dell, EMC and VMware product portfolios into unified offerings optimized for their platforms. If Dell decides to sell its own solutions over our products, that could adversely impact our OEM sales and harm our business, operating results and prospects, and our stock price could decline.  10Table of ContentsFurther, since we account for OEM sales, including sales made by Dell, as software sales for revenue recognition purposes, and because we have decided to early adopt the new revenue recognition standard (Accounting Standard Update 2014-09, Revenue from Contracts with Customers, or ASC 606) effective as of August 1, 2017, any reduction in OEM sales by any of our OEM partners will have an increased impact on our reported revenue and gross margins in future periods, potentially making it more difficult for us to forecast revenue and gross margins in future quarters.  Under ASC 606, revenue from Dell would have accounted for approximately 12% and 10% of our total revenue in fiscal 2016 and fiscal 2017, respectively.
CONTENT_8:
We have experienced significant growth in recent periods with total revenue of $241.4 million, $444.9 million&#32;and $766.9 million&#32;for fiscal 2015, fiscal 2016&#32;and fiscal 2017, respectively. You should not consider our revenue growth in recent periods as indicative of our future performance. While we have recently experienced significant revenue growth, we may not achieve similar revenue growth in future periods. Accordingly, you should not rely on our revenue growth for any prior periods as an indication of our future revenue or revenue growth.
CONTENT_9:
We have expanded our overall business and operations significantly in recent periods. Our employee headcount increased from 247 as of July&#160;31, 2013 to 2,813&#32;as of July&#160;31, 2017, and we may have significant headcount increases in the future. We anticipate that our operating expenses will increase in the foreseeable future as we scale our business, including in developing and improving our solutions, expanding our sales and marketing capabilities and global coverage, and in providing general and administrative resources to support our growth. As we continue to grow our business, we must effectively integrate, develop and motivate a large number of new employees, as well as existing employees who are promoted or moved into new roles, while maintaining the effectiveness of our business execution. In particular, our success depends heavily on our ability to ramp new sales teams in a fast and effective manner. We must also continue to improve and expand our IT and financial infrastructure, management systems and product management and sales processes. We expect that our future growth will continue to place a significant strain on our management, operational and financial resources. We may incur costs associated with future growth prior to realizing the anticipated benefits, and the return on these investments may be lower, or may develop more slowly than we expect. If we are unable to manage our growth effectively, we may not be able to take advantage of market opportunities. We also may fail to satisfy end-customers&#8217; requirements, maintain product quality, execute on our business plan or respond to competitive pressures, any of which could adversely affect our business, operating results, financial condition and prospects.
CONTENT_10:
We operate in the intensely competitive enterprise infrastructure market and compete primarily with companies that sell software to build and operate enterprise clouds, integrated systems, and standalone storage and servers, as well as providers of public cloud infrastructure solutions. These markets are characterized by constant change and rapid innovation. Our main competitors fall into the following categories: &#8226;software providers such as VMware, Inc., or VMware, and Red Hat, Inc., that offer a broad range of virtualization, infrastructure and management products to build and operate enterprise clouds; &#8226;traditional IT systems vendors such as Hewlett Packard Enterprise Company, or HPE, Cisco Systems, Inc., or Cisco, Lenovo Group Ltd., Dell Technologies Inc., or Dell, Hitachi Data Systems Corporation, or Hitachi, and International Business Machines Corporation, or IBM, that offer integrated systems that include bundles of servers, storage and networking solutions, as well as a broad range of standalone server and storage products; &#8226;traditional storage array vendors such as Dell, NetApp, Inc., or NetApp, and Hitachi, which typically sell centralized storage products; and&#8226;providers of public cloud infrastructure such as Amazon.com, Inc., Google Inc., and Microsoft Corporation.11Table of ContentsIn addition, we compete against vendors of hyperconverged infrastructure and software-defined storage products such as VMware, Cisco, HPE, Dell and many smaller emerging companies. As our market grows, we expect it will continue to attract new companies as well as existing larger vendors. For example, NetApp recently released its first hyperconverged solution.  Some of our competitors may expand their product offerings, acquire competing businesses, sell at lower prices, bundle with other products, provide closed technology platforms or otherwise attempt to gain a competitive advantage. For example, HPE acquired SimpliVity Corporation and Cisco recently announced its intention to acquire Springpath, Inc., both of which are emerging hyperconverged vendors, in order to bolster their own hyperconverged product lines.  Furthermore, as we expand our product offerings, we may expand into new markets and we may encounter additional competitors in such markets.  Additionally, as companies increasingly offer competing solutions, they may be less willing to partner with us as an OEM or otherwise.Many of our existing competitors have, and some of our potential competitors may have, competitive advantages over us, such as longer operating histories, significantly greater financial, technical, marketing or other resources, stronger brand awareness and name recognition, larger intellectual property portfolios and broader global presence and distribution networks. Furthermore, some of our competitors supply a wide variety of products to, and have well-established relationships with, our current and prospective end-customers. Some of these competitors have in the past and may in the future take advantage of their existing relationships with end-customers, distributors or resellers to provide incentives to such current or prospective end-customers that make their products more economically attractive or to interfere with our ability to offer our solutions to our end-customers. Our competitors may also be able to offer products or functionality similar to ours at a more attractive price, such as by integrating or bundling their solutions with their other product offerings or those of technology partners or establishing cooperative relationships with other competitors, technology partners or other third parties. Potential end-customers may prefer to purchase from their existing suppliers rather than a new supplier, especially given the significant investments that they have historically made in their legacy infrastructures. Some of our competitors may also have stronger or broader relationships with technology partners than we do, which could make their products more attractive than ours. As a result, we cannot assure you that our solutions will compete favorably, and any failure to do so could adversely affect our business, operating results and prospects.
CONTENT_11:
We began selling our products in October 2011. We have relatively limited historical financial data, and we operate in a rapidly evolving market. Our relatively limited operating history makes it difficult to evaluate our current business and our future prospects, including our ability to plan for and model future growth. For example, recent changes in our sales organization have impacted our sales productivity, making it difficult to project our business growth.  In addition, the rapidly evolving nature of the enterprise IT infrastructure market, as well as other factors beyond our control, reduces our ability to accurately forecast quarterly or annual performance. Our solutions may never reach widespread adoption, and changes or advances in technologies could adversely affect the demand for our solutions. A reduction in demand for web-scale architectures caused by lack of customer acceptance, technological challenges, competing technologies and solutions or otherwise would result in lower revenue growth rates or decreased revenue, either of which could negatively impact our business, operating results and prospects. Any predictions about future revenue and expenses may not be as accurate as they would be if we had a longer operating history. We have encountered and will continue to encounter risks and difficulties associated with rapid growth and expansion and a relatively limited operating history. If we do not address these risks successfully, our business and operating results would be adversely affected, and our stock price could decline. 12Table of Contents
CONTENT_12:
Significant developments in enterprise IT infrastructure technologies, such as advances in storage, virtualization, containers and management software, may materially and adversely affect our business, operating results and prospects in ways we do not currently anticipate. For example, improvements in existing data storage technologies, such as a significant increase in the speed of traditional interfaces for transferring data between a server and a storage system or the speed of traditional embedded controllers within the storage system, could emerge as a preferred alternative to our solutions, especially if they are sold at lower prices. Any failure by us to develop new or enhanced technologies or processes, to react to changes or advances in existing technologies or to correctly anticipate these changes or advances as we create and invest in our product roadmap could materially delay our development and introduction of new solutions, which could result in the loss of competitiveness of our solutions, decreased revenue and a loss of market share to competitors. In addition, the servers, network, software and other components and systems of a datacenter must comply with established industry standards in order to interoperate and function efficiently together. If larger companies who are more influential in driving industry standards do not support the same standards we use, market acceptance of our solutions could be adversely affected, or we may be required to spend significant time and resources duplicating efforts to adapt to different standards. Public cloud infrastructure offers alternatives to the on-premise infrastructure deployments that our operating system primarily supports. Various factors could cause the rate of adoption of public cloud infrastructure to increase, including continued or accelerated decreases in the price of public cloud offerings and improvements in the ability of public cloud providers to deliver reliable performance, enhanced security, better application compatibility and more precise infrastructure control. Any of these factors could make our operating system less competitive as compared to the public cloud, and could materially and adversely affect the demand for our solutions.
CONTENT_13:
Our solutions provide an operating system on which software applications and hypervisors from different software providers run. As a result, our solutions must interoperate with our end-customers&#8217; existing hardware and software infrastructure, specifically their networks, servers, software and operating systems, as well as the applications that they run on this infrastructure, which may be manufactured and provided by a wide variety of vendors and OEMs. In addition to ensuring that our solutions interoperate with these hardware and software products initially, we must occasionally update our software to ensure that our solutions continue to interoperate with new or updated versions of these hardware and software products. Current or future providers of hardware, software applications, hypervisors or data management tools could make changes that would diminish the ability of our solutions to interoperate with them, and significant additional time and effort may be necessary to ensure the continued compatibility of our solutions, which might not be possible at all. Even if our solutions are compatible with those of other providers, if they do not certify or support our solutions for their systems or cooperate with us to coordinate troubleshooting and hand off of support cases, end-customers may be reluctant to buy our solutions, which could decrease demand for our solutions and harm our ability to achieve a return on the investments and resources that we have dedicated to ensuring compatibility. Developing solutions that interoperate properly requires substantial partnering, capital investment and employee resources, as well as the cooperation of the vendors or developers of the software applications and hypervisors both with respect to product development and product support. Vendors may not provide us with early or any access to their technology and products, assist us in these development efforts, certify our solutions, share with or sell to us any APIs, formats, or protocols we may need, or cooperate with us to support end-customers. If they do not provide us with the necessary access, assistance or proprietary technology on a timely basis or at all, we may experience product development delays or be unable to ensure the compatibility of our solutions with such new technology or products. To the extent that vendors develop products that compete with ours, they have in the past, and may again in the future, withhold their cooperation, decline to share access, certify our solutions or sell or make available to us their proprietary APIs, protocols or formats or engage in practices to actively limit the functionality, or compatibility, and certification of our products. If any of the foregoing occurs, our product development efforts may be delayed or impaired, our solutions could become less attractive to end-customers resulting in a decline in sales, and our business, operating results and prospects may be adversely affected. 13Table of Contents
CONTENT_14:
Software-only sales typically reflect higher gross margins and lower revenue in a given period, as compared to software sales deployed on off-the-shelf servers, since the sale does not include the revenue or cost of the hardware components in an appliance.&#32;If adoption of our solutions continues to increase, there may be an increase in the delivery of our solutions as software-only licenses on separately procured hardware, and our overall product mix may shift more towards sales of our solutions as software-only licenses. Unless we can replace the hardware revenue with additional software sales, any increase in software-only sales may cause our revenue to decline, and our gross margins to fluctuate,&#32;and may adversely impact our operating results in the short term.
CONTENT_15:
We operate in a dynamic environment characterized by rapidly changing technologies and industry standards and technological obsolescence. We will need to continue to create valuable software solutions and integrate these solutions across hardware platforms. To compete successfully, we must design, develop, market and sell new or enhanced solutions that provide increasingly higher levels of performance, capacity, scalability, security, application mobility, and reliability and meet the cost expectations of our end-customers. The introduction of new products by our competitors, the market acceptance of products based on new or alternative technologies, or the emergence of new industry standards could render our existing or future solutions obsolete or less attractive to end-customers. Any failure to anticipate or develop new or enhanced solutions or technologies in a timely or cost-effective manner in response to technological shifts could result in decreased revenue and harm to our business and prospects. Any new feature or application that we develop or acquire may not be introduced in a timely or cost-effective manner and may not achieve broad market acceptance and investments in research and development or efforts to optimize our engineering cost structure may not be successful. If we fail to introduce new or enhanced solutions that meet the needs of our end-customers or penetrate new markets in a timely fashion, we will lose market share and our business, operating results and prospects will be adversely affected.
CONTENT_16:
Our growth strategy is dependent in large part upon increasing sales of our solutions to new and existing large enterprises, service providers and government entities, particularly when such sales result in large orders for our solutions. Sales to these end-customers involve risks that may not be present (or that are present to a lesser extent) with sales to smaller end-customers, which can act as a disincentive to our sales team to pursue these larger end-customers. These risks include: &#8226;competition from companies that traditionally target larger enterprises, service providers and government entities and that may have pre-existing relationships or purchase commitments from such end-customers; &#8226;increased purchasing power and leverage held by large end-customers in negotiating contractual arrangements with us; &#8226;more stringent requirements in our support service contracts, including demand for quicker support response times and penalties for any failure to meet support requirements; and &#8226;longer sales cycles and the associated risk that substantial time and resources may be spent on a potential end-customer that elects not to purchase our solutions.14Table of ContentsLarge organizations often undertake a significant evaluation process that results in a lengthy sales cycle. Although we have a channel sales model, our sales representatives typically engage in direct interaction with our prospective end-customers as well as our distributors and resellers. We typically provide evaluation products to these end-customers and may spend substantial time, effort and money in our sales efforts to these prospective end-customers. In addition, product purchases by large organizations are frequently subject to budget constraints, multiple approvals and unanticipated administrative, processing and other delays. Finally, large organizations typically have longer implementation cycles, require greater product functionality and scalability, require a broader range of services, demand that vendors take on a larger share of risks, require acceptance provisions that can lead to a delay in revenue recognition and expect greater payment flexibility. If we fail to realize an expected sale from a large end-customer in a particular quarter or at all, our business and operating results could be adversely affected. All of these factors can add further risk to business conducted with these end-customers.
CONTENT_17:
Our future success depends in part on purchases by our existing end-customers of additional appliances and software as well as renewals and upgrades to their support and software maintenance agreements. If our end-customers do not purchase additional software licenses or appliances or software upgrades, or renew or upgrade their support and software maintenance agreements, our revenue may decline and our operating results may be harmed. In order for us to maintain or improve our operating results, we depend on our existing end-customers renewing support and software maintenance agreements or purchasing additional appliances. End-customers may choose not to renew their support and software maintenance agreements or purchase additional appliances because of several factors, including dissatisfaction with our prices or features relative to competitive offerings, reductions in our end-customers&#8217; spending levels or other causes outside of our control. If our existing end-customers do not purchase new solutions, or renew or upgrade their support and software maintenance agreements, our revenue may grow more slowly than expected or may decline, and our business and operating results may be adversely affected.
CONTENT_18:
Our success and future growth depends to a significant degree on the skills and continued services of our executive officers and key personnel. In particular, we are highly dependent on the services of Dheeraj Pandey, our Chief Executive Officer and Chairman, who is critical to the development of our technology, future vision and strategic direction. We do not have life insurance policies that cover any of our executive officers or other key employees. The loss of the services of Mr. Pandey or any of our key employees or executive officers could disrupt our business and negatively impact our operating results, prospects and future growth. Our future success also depends on our ability to continue to attract, integrate and retain highly skilled personnel, especially skilled sales and engineering employees. Competition for highly skilled personnel is frequently intense, especially in the San Francisco Bay Area where we are headquartered. Volatility or lack of performance in our stock price may also affect our ability to attract and retain our key employees. We cannot assure you that we will be able to successfully attract or retain qualified personnel. Our inability to attract and retain the necessary personnel could adversely affect our business, operating results and financial condition. 15Table of Contents
CONTENT_19:
Although we have a channel sales model, our sales representatives typically engage in direct interaction with our prospective end-customers. Therefore, we continue to be substantially dependent on our sales force to obtain new end-customers and sell additional solutions to our existing end-customers. There is significant competition for sales personnel with the skills and technical knowledge that we require. Our ability to achieve significant revenue growth will depend, in large part, on our success in recruiting, training and retaining sufficient numbers of sales personnel to support our growth. New hires require significant training and may take significant time before they achieve full productivity; we estimate based on past experience that sales team members typically do not fully ramp and are not fully productive until around the time of the start of their fourth quarter of employment with us. Our recent hires and planned hires may not become productive as quickly as we expect, and we may be unable to hire or retain sufficient numbers of qualified individuals in the markets where we do business or plan to do business. Furthermore, hiring sales personnel in new countries requires additional set up, upfront and ongoing costs that we may not recover if the sales personnel fail to achieve full productivity. In addition, as a result of our rapid growth, a large percentage of our sales force is new to our company and our solutions and therefore less effective than our more seasoned employees. If these new employees do not become fully productive on the timelines that we have projected, our revenue will not increase at anticipated levels and our ability to achieve long term projections may be negatively impacted. If we are unable to hire and train sufficient numbers of effective sales personnel, or the sales personnel are not successful in obtaining new end-customers or increasing sales to our existing customer base, our business, operating results and prospects will be adversely affected.
CONTENT_20:
As indicated above, our growth is dependent in large part on increasing our sales to large enterprises, particularly when those sales result in large orders for our solutions.  Over the past year, we have started to segment our sales force to focus on these major accounts and large deals.  This process, which we anticipate will continue for the foreseeable future, has involved hiring new, and promoting existing members of our sales team into, global account manager roles that will focus exclusively on large sales to major accounts.  As discussed above, we anticipate that the sales cycles associated with major accounts will be longer that our traditional sales cycles, which will increase the time it will take our new global account managers to become fully productive.  The new sales processes and leadership structures for these global sales teams may also take longer than anticipated to implement, further impacting productivity.  In addition, as our organization focuses more heavily on major accounts and large deals, the productivity of our traditional sales teams may be impacted. For example, we experienced what we believe was a short-term decrease in sales productivity of our North American sales teams as well as a reduction in the number of large deals executed during the quarter ended January 31, 2017 due to the continued segmentation of our sales teams.&#32;&#32;These potential fluctuations in sales productivity make it more difficult to accurately project our operating results or plan for future growth.&#32;&#32;If we unable to effectively manage these changes or implement our news sales structure in a timely manner, or if our decision to segment our sales force is not successful in obtaining large sales of our solutions, our growth and ability to achieve long term projections may be negatively impacted, and our business and operating results will be adversely affected.
CONTENT_21:
We primarily sell our solutions through indirect sales channels, including channel partners such as distributors, our hardware OEM partners, value added resellers and system integrators. Our OEM partners in turn distribute our solutions through their own networks of channel partners with whom we have no direct relationships. 16Table of ContentsWe rely, to a significant degree, on our channel partners to select, screen and maintain relationships with their distribution networks and to distribute our solutions in a manner that is consistent with applicable law, regulatory requirements and our quality standards. If our channel partners or a partner in their distribution network violates applicable law or regulatory requirements or misrepresents the functionality of our solutions, our reputation could be damaged and we could be subject to potential liability. Additionally, if we are unable to establish relationships with strong channel partners in key growth regions, our ability to sell our solutions in these regions may be adversely affected. Our agreements with our channel partners are non-exclusive, meaning our channel partners may offer end-customers the products of several different companies, including products that compete with ours. If our channel partners do not effectively market and sell our solutions, choose to use greater efforts to market and sell their own products or those of our competitors, or fail to meet the needs of our end-customers, our business, operating results and prospects may be adversely affected. Our channel partners may cease marketing our solutions with limited or no notice and with little or no penalty. The loss of a substantial number of our channel partners, together with our inability to replace them, or the failure to recruit additional channel partners or establish an alternative distribution network could materially and adversely affect our business and operating results. For example, sales through Carahsoft Technology Corp. and Promark Technology Inc. to our end-customers represented 23%&#32;and 15%, respectively, of our total revenue for fiscal 2015, represented 15%&#32;and 20%, respectively, of our total revenue for fiscal 2016, and represented 11%&#32;and 22%, respectively, of our total revenue for fiscal 2017. In addition, if a channel partner offers its own products or services that are competitive to our solutions, is acquired by a competitor or reorganizes or divests its reseller business units, our revenue derived from that partner may be adversely impacted or eliminated altogether. Recruiting and retaining qualified channel partners and training them in the use of our technologies require significant time and resources. If we fail to devote sufficient resources to support and expand our network of channel partners, our business may be adversely affected. Maintaining strong indirect sales channels for our products and effectively leveraging our channel partners and OEMs is important to our growth strategy, and the failure to effectively manage these relationships may lead to higher costs and reduced revenue. Also, in certain international markets we are in the process of transitioning our distribution model from contracting directly with hundreds of individual resellers to contracting with a smaller number of larger global distributors. Although we believe that this transition will make our sales channels more efficient and broader reaching in the long term in these markets, there is no guarantee that this new distribution model will increase our sales in the short term or allow us to sustain our gross margins. Any potential delays or confusion during the transition process to our new partners may negatively affect our relationship with our existing end-customers and channel partners and may cause us to lose prospective end-customers or additional business from existing end-customers. Upon completion of the transition to the new sales model, we will be more reliant on fewer channel partners, which may reduce our contact with our end-customers making it more difficult for us to establish brand awareness, ensure proper delivery and installation of our software, support ongoing end-customer requirements, estimate end-customer demand, respond to evolving end-customer needs and obtain subscription renewals from end-customers. All of our sales to government entities have been made indirectly through our channel partners. Government entities may have statutory, contractual or other legal rights to terminate contracts with our channel partners for convenience or due to a default, and, in the future, if the portion of government contracts that are subject to renegotiation or termination at the election of the government are material, any such termination or renegotiation may adversely impact our future operating results.  Additionally, we sometimes rely on our channel partners to satisfy certain regulatory obligations that we would otherwise have to satisfy if we sold directly to the government entities, and our channel partners may be unable or unwilling to satisfy these obligations in the future.  In the event of such termination or change, it may be difficult for us to arrange for another channel partner to sell our solutions to these government entities in a timely manner, and we could lose sales opportunities during the transition. Governments routinely investigate and audit government contractors&#8217; (including subcontractors') administrative processes, and any unfavorable audit could result in the government refusing to continue buying our solutions, our channel partners changing their business models or refusing to continue to sell our solutions under current models, a reduction of revenue or fines, or civil or criminal liability if the audit uncovers improper or illegal activities.If our indirect distribution channel is disrupted, particularly if we are reliant on a fewer number of channel partners, or if we are required to directly satisfy certain regulatory obligations imposed by government entities as a result of our efforts to expand our sales to government entities, we may be required to devote more time and resources to distribute our solutions directly and support our end-customers, which may not be as effective and could lead to higher costs, reduced revenue and growth that is slower than expected. 17Table of Contents
CONTENT_22:
Our operating results may fluctuate due to a variety of factors, many of which are outside of our control. As a result, comparing our operating results on a period-to-period basis may not be meaningful. If our revenue or operating results in any particular period fall below investor expectations, the price of our Class&#160;A common stock would likely decline. Factors that are difficult to predict and that could cause our operating results to fluctuate include: &#8226;the timing and magnitude of orders, shipments and acceptance of our solutions in any quarter; &#8226;our ability to attract new and retain existing end-customers; &#8226;disruptions in our sales channels or termination of our relationship with important channel partners and OEMs; &#8226;the timing of revenue recognition for our sales, which will materially change for the majority of sales of software-only licenses on or after August 1, 2017 as a result of our adoption of the new ASC 606 revenue recognition standard which requires us to recognize the revenue from sales of software licenses upon transfer of control to our end-customers, instead of deferring the revenue over the post contract support period; this change will heighten the impact of any fluctuations in the timing and magnitude of software-only sales on our quarterly operating results; &#8226;reductions in end-customers&#8217; budgets for information technology purchases; &#8226;delays in end-customers&#8217; purchasing cycles or deferments of end-customers&#8217; purchases in anticipation of new products or updates from us or our competitors; &#8226;fluctuations in demand and competitive pricing pressures for our solutions; &#8226;the mix of solutions, sold, including the mix between appliance and software-only sales and the mix of the types of appliances that we sell, and the mix of revenue between products and support and other services;&#8226;our ability to develop, introduce and ship in a timely manner new solutions and product enhancements that meet customer requirements; &#8226;the timing of product releases or upgrades or announcements by us or our competitors; &#8226;any change in the competitive dynamics of our markets, including consolidation among our competitors or resellers, new entrants or discounting of prices; &#8226;the amount and timing of expenses to grow our business and the extent to which we are able to take advantage of economies of scale or to leverage our relationships with OEM or channel partners; &#8226;the costs associated with acquiring new businesses and technologies and the follow-on costs of integrating and consolidating the results of acquired businesses; &#8226;the amount and timing of stock-based compensation expenses; &#8226;our ability to control the costs of our solutions and their key components, or to pass along any cost increases to our end-customers;  &#8226;general economic, industry and market conditions; and &#8226;future accounting pronouncements and changes in accounting policies, including our ability to implement the new procedures and processes necessary to accurately recognize our revenue under the new ASC 606 revenue recognition standard.The occurrence of any one of these risks could negatively affect our operating results in any particular quarter, which could cause the price of our Class&#160;A common stock to decline.18Table of Contents&#160;
CONTENT_23:
Our gross margins may be affected by a variety of factors, including shifts in the mix of whether our solutions are sold as an appliance or as software-only, fluctuations in the pricing of our products, including as a result of competitive pricing pressures or increases in component pricing, and the degree to which we are successful in selling the value of incremental feature improvements and upgrades, changes in the cost of components of our hardware appliances, changes in the mix between direct versus indirect sales, changes in the mix of products sold, including whether they are sold as appliances or as software-only, and the timing and amount of recognized and deferred revenue, particularly as our recognition of revenue from sales of software-only licenses changes following our adoption of the new ASC 606 revenue recognition standard. For example, in the last three quarters of fiscal 2017, the prices of DRAM and NAND components increased due to supply constraints, causing a negative impact on our gross margin. We expect these price increases to continue for the immediate future, and to continue to impact our gross margin. If we are unable to manage these factors effectively, our gross margins may decline, and fluctuations in gross margin may make it difficult to manage our business and to achieve or maintain profitability, which could adversely affect our business and operating results.
CONTENT_24:
Our sales efforts involve educating our end-customers about the uses and benefits of our solutions, including their technical capabilities and cost saving potential. End-customers often undertake an evaluation and testing process that can result in a lengthy sales cycle. Increasing competition and the emergence of new hyperconverged infrastructure product offerings often result in customers evaluating multiple vendors at the same time, which can further lengthen the sales cycle. We spend substantial time and resources on our sales efforts without any assurance that our efforts will produce any sales. Platform purchases are frequently subject to budget constraints, multiple approvals and unanticipated administrative, processing and other delays. The broad nature of the technology shift that our solutions represent and the legacy relationships our end-customers have with existing IT vendors sometimes lead to unpredictable sales cycles, which make it difficult for us to predict when end-customers may purchase solutions from us. The unpredictable nature of our sales cycles may be increased in future periods as we focus our sales efforts more heavily on major accounts and large deals. Our business and operating results will be significantly affected by the degree to which and speed with which organizations adopt our solutions.
CONTENT_25:
We rely substantially on Super Micro Computer, Inc., or Super Micro, and Flextronics Systems Limited, or Flextronics, to assemble and test our appliances. Our reliance on these contract manufacturers reduces our control over the manufacturing process and exposes us to risks, including reduced control over quality assurance, product costs and product supply and timing. Furthermore, our orders represent a relatively small percentage of the overall orders received by our third-party manufacturers from their customers. Therefore, fulfilling our orders may not be a priority in guiding their business decisions and operational commitments. If we fail to manage our relationships with these contract manufacturers effectively, inaccurately forecast our component requirements, or if either of them experience delays or increased manufacturing lead-times, disruptions, capacity constraints or quality control problems in their operations or are unable to meet our requirements for timely delivery, or we are unable to shift operations from one contract manufacturer to the other, our ability to ship high-quality solutions to our end-customers could be severely impaired, we could incur substantial costs, such as costs relating to the procurement of non-standard components and inventory costs, and our business and operating results, competitive position and reputation could be harmed. 19Table of ContentsOur agreement with Super Micro expires in May 2018, and automatically renews for successive one-year periods thereafter with the option to terminate upon each annual renewal , and does not contain any minimum long-term commitment to manufacture our solutions. In addition, in the third quarter of fiscal 2017, we entered into a Memorandum of Understanding with Flextronics pursuant to which we have transitioned and will continue to transition portions of our manufacturing operations to Flextronics, and we are currently working with Flextronics to finalize a manufacturing agreement. The Flextronics Memorandum of Understanding does not contain any minimum long-term commitment to manufacture our solutions, and the terms of the manufacturing agreement have not yet been finalized. Further, any orders are fulfilled only after a purchase order has been delivered and accepted. If we are required to change contract manufacturers, we may lose revenue, incur increased costs and damage our channel partner and end-customer relationships. We may also decide to switch or bring on additional contract manufacturers in order to better meet our needs. Switching to or bringing on a new contract manufacturer and commencing production is expensive and time-consuming and may cause delays in order fulfillment at our existing contract manufacturers or cause other disruptions. For example, while we have already transitioned some of our manufacturing operations to Flextronics, we may encounter unexpected issues as we scale our operations with them. Our agreements with Super Micro and Flextronics do not contain any price assurances, and any increases in component costs, without a corresponding increase in the price of our solutions, could harm our gross margins. Furthermore, we may need to increase our component purchases, manufacturing capacity and internal test and quality functions if we experience increased demand. The inability of Super Micro, Flextronics or other contract manufacturers to provide us with adequate supplies of high-quality products could cause a delay in our order fulfillment, and our business, operating results and prospects would be adversely affected.
CONTENT_26:
We rely on a limited number of suppliers, and in some cases single-source suppliers, for several key hardware components of our appliances. These components are generally purchased on a purchase order basis through Super Micro and we do not have long-term supply contracts with our suppliers. Our reliance on key suppliers exposes us to risks, including reduced control over product quality, production and component costs, timely delivery and capacity. It also exposes us to the potential inability to obtain an adequate supply of required components because we do not have long-term supply commitments, and replacing some of these components would require a product qualification process that could take months to complete. Furthermore, we extensively test and qualify the components that are used in our appliances to ensure that they meet certain quality and performance specifications. If our supply of certain components is disrupted or delayed, or if we need to replace our existing suppliers, there can be no assurance that additional supplies or components can serve as adequate replacements for the existing components, will be available when required or that supplies will be available on terms that are favorable to us, and we may be required to modify our solutions to interoperate with the replacement components. Any of these developments could extend our lead times, increase the costs of our components or costs of product development and adversely affect our business, operating results and financial condition. We generally maintain minimal inventory for repairs and a limited number of evaluation and demonstration units, and generally acquire components only as needed. We do not enter into long-term supply contracts for these components. As a result, our ability to respond to channel partner or end-customer orders efficiently may be constrained by the then-current availability, terms and pricing of these components. The technology industry has experienced component shortages and delivery delays in the past, and we may experience shortages or delays of critical components in the future as a result of strong demand in the industry or other factors. If we or our suppliers inaccurately forecast demand for our solutions or we ineffectively manage our enterprise resource planning processes, our suppliers may have inadequate inventory, which could increase the prices we must pay for substitute components or result in our inability to meet demand for our solutions, as well as damage our channel partner or end-customer relationships. 20Table of ContentsIf the suppliers of the components of our hardware appliances increase prices of components, experience delays, disruptions, capacity constraints, quality control problems in their manufacturing operations or adverse changes to their financial condition, our ability to ship appliances to our channel partners or end-customers in a timely manner and at competitive prices could be impaired and our competitive, reputation, and operating results could be adversely affected.  For example, in the last three quarters of fiscal 2017, the prices of DRAM and NAND components increased due to supply constraints. Qualifying a new component is expensive and time-consuming. If we are required to change key suppliers or assume internal manufacturing operations, we may lose revenue and damage our channel partner or end-customer relationships which could adversely impact our revenue and operating results.
CONTENT_27:
.We enter into arrangements with our suppliers whereby the supplier will purchase certain quantities of components and allocate them exclusively for our use in our products.  If we are unable to use the inventory within a specified period, we may be required to purchase the inventory, or to pay the supplier the difference between the price at which the supplier purchased the inventory and the price at which the supplier is ultimately able to sell the inventory to a third party.  As a result, if we inaccurately or mistakenly forecast our need for any such components, or if the market price of any such components decreases after the components are purchased by a supplier, we may suffer losses with respect to such inventory, and our business and operating results could be adversely affected.
CONTENT_28:
We outsource the warehousing and delivery of all of our appliances to a third-party logistics provider for worldwide fulfillment. In addition, some of our support offerings commit us to replace defective parts in our appliances as quickly as four hours after the initial customer support call is received, which we satisfy by storing replacement parts inventory in various third-party supply depots in strategic locations. As a result of relying on third parties, we have reduced control over shipping and logistics, quality control, security and the supply of replacement parts for support. Consequently, we may be subject to shipping disruptions as well as failures to provide adequate support for reasons that are outside of our direct control. If we are unable to have our appliances or replacement products shipped in a timely manner, end-customers may cancel their contracts with us, we may suffer reputational harm and our business, operating results and prospects may be adversely affected.
CONTENT_29:
Once our solutions are deployed, our end-customers depend on our support organization to resolve any technical issues relating to our solutions. Furthermore, because of the emerging nature of our solutions, our support organization often provides support for and troubleshoots issues for products of other vendors running on our solutions, even if the issue is unrelated to our solutions. There is no assurance that we can solve issues unrelated to our solutions, or that vendors whose products run on our solutions will not challenge our provision of technical assistance to their products. Our ability to provide effective support is largely dependent on our ability to attract, train and retain personnel who are not only qualified to support our solutions, but also well versed in some of the primary applications and hypervisors that our end-customers run on our solutions. Furthermore, as we expand our operations internationally, our support organization will face additional challenges, including those associated with delivering support, training and documentation in languages other than English. Any failure to maintain high-quality installation and technical support, or a market perception that we do not maintain high-quality support, could harm our reputation, adversely affect our ability to sell our solutions to existing and prospective end-customers, and could harm our business, operating results and financial condition. 21Table of Contents
CONTENT_30:
Our solutions are highly technical and complex and are often used to store information critical to our end-customers&#8217; business operations. Our solutions may contain undetected errors, defects or security vulnerabilities that could result in data unavailability, unauthorized access to, loss, corruption or other harm to our end-customers&#8217; data. Some errors or defects in our solutions may only be discovered after they have been installed and used by end-customers. We previously conducted an in-field replacement of equipment manufactured by our previous outsourced manufacturer, and may be required to do so again in the future.  In addition, we may make certain commitments to our OEM partners regarding the time frames within which we will correct any security vulnerabilities in our software. If any hardware or software errors, defects or security vulnerabilities are discovered in our solutions after commercial release, a number of negative effects in our business could result, including: &#8226;lost revenue or lost OEM or other channel partners or end-customers;  &#8226;increased costs, including warranty expense and costs associated with end-customer support as well as development costs to remedy the errors or defects; &#8226;delays, cancellations, reductions or rescheduling of orders or shipments; &#8226;product returns or discounts; and &#8226;damage to our reputation and brand.In addition, we could face legal claims for breach of contract, product liability, tort or breach of warranty. While many of our contracts with end-customers contain provisions relating to warranty disclaimers and liability limitations, these provisions might not be upheld or might not provide adequate protection if we face such legal claims. Defending a lawsuit, regardless of its merit, could be costly and may divert management&#8217;s attention and adversely affect the market&#8217;s perception of us and our solutions. In addition, our business liability insurance coverage could prove inadequate with respect to a claim and future coverage may be unavailable on acceptable terms or at all. These product-related issues could result in claims against us and our business could be adversely impacted.
CONTENT_31:
We derive a portion of our revenue from contracts with federal, state, local and foreign governments, and we believe that the success and growth of our business will continue to depend on our successful procurement of government contracts. However, demand is often unpredictable from government organizations, and there can be no assurance that we will be able to maintain or grow our revenue from the public sector. Government agencies are subject to budgetary processes and expenditure constraints that could lead to delays or decreased capital expenditures in IT spending, particularly in light of continued uncertainties about government spending levels and recent changes to, or failure to appoint new, government leaders. The budget and approval process for government agencies also experiences a longer sales cycle relative to our other end-customers. If government organizations reduce or shift their capital spending patterns, our business, operating results and prospects may be harmed. Factors that could impede our ability to maintain or increase the amount of revenue derived from government contracts, include: &#8226;public sector budgetary cycles and funding authorizations; &#8226;changes in fiscal or contracting policies; &#8226;decreases in available government funding; &#8226;changes in government programs or applicable requirements; &#8226;the adoption of new laws or regulations or changes to existing laws or regulations; 22Table of Contents&#8226;potential delays or changes in the government appropriations or other funding authorization processes; and &#8226;higher expenses associated with, or delays caused by, diligence and qualifying or maintaining qualification as a government vendor.The occurrence of any of the foregoing could cause governments and governmental agencies to delay or refrain from purchasing our solutions in the future or otherwise have an adverse effect on our business, operating results and prospects.
CONTENT_32:
A number of companies, both within and outside of the enterprise computing infrastructure industry, hold a large number of patents covering aspects of storage, servers and virtualization products. In addition to these patents, participants in this industry typically also protect their technology through copyrights and trade secrets. As a result, there is frequent litigation based on allegations of infringement, misappropriation or other violations of intellectual property rights. We have received, and in the future may receive, inquiries from other intellectual property holders and may become subject to claims that we infringe their intellectual property rights, particularly as we expand our presence in the market and face increasing competition. Based upon our review of these claims, we believe we have meritorious defenses to the allegations, although there can be no assurance that we will be successful in defending against these allegations or reaching a business resolution that is satisfactory to us. In addition, parties may claim that the names and branding of our solution infringe their trademark rights in certain countries or territories. If such a claim were to prevail we may have to change the names and branding of our solution in the affected territories and we could incur other costs.&#32;We currently have a number of agreements in effect pursuant to which we have agreed to defend, indemnify and hold harmless our end-customers, suppliers and channel and other partners from damages and costs which may arise from the infringement by our solutions of third-party patents or other intellectual property rights. The scope of these indemnity obligations varies, but may, in some instances, include indemnification for damages and expenses, including attorneys&#8217; fees. Our insurance may not cover all intellectual property infringement claims. A claim that our solutions infringe a third party&#8217;s intellectual property rights, even if untrue, could harm our relationships with our end-customers and/or channel partners, may deter future end-customers from purchasing our solutions and could expose us to costly litigation and settlement expenses. Even if we are not a party to any litigation between a customer and a third party relating to infringement by our solutions, an adverse outcome in any such litigation could make it more difficult for us to defend our solutions against intellectual property infringement claims in any subsequent litigation in which we are a named party. Any of these results could harm our brand and operating results.Our defense of intellectual property rights claims brought against us or our end-customers, suppliers and channel partners, with or without merit, could be time-consuming, expensive to litigate or settle, divert management resources and attention and force us to acquire intellectual property rights and licenses, which may involve substantial royalty or other payments. Further, a party making such a claim, if successful, could secure a judgment that requires us to pay substantial damages. An adverse determination also could invalidate our intellectual property rights and prevent us from offering our solutions to our end-customers and may require that we procure or develop substitute solutions that do not infringe, which could require significant effort and expense. We may have to seek a license for the technology, which may not be available on acceptable terms or at all, and as a result may significantly increase our operating expenses or require us to restrict our business activities in one or more respects. Any of these events could adversely affect our business, operating results, financial condition and prospects. 23Table of Contents
CONTENT_33:

CONTENT_34:

CONTENT_35:
As a public company, we are subject to the reporting requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended, or Exchange Act, the Sarbanes-Oxley Act of 2002, or the Sarbanes-Oxley Act, and the rules and regulations of the NASDAQ Stock Market. We expect that the requirements of these rules and regulations will continue to increase our legal, accounting and financial compliance costs, make some activities more difficult, time-consuming and costly, and place significant strain on our personnel, systems and resources. The Sarbanes-Oxley Act requires, among other things, that we maintain effective disclosure controls and procedures and internal control over financial reporting. We are continuing to develop and refine our disclosure controls, internal control over financial reporting and other procedures that are designed to ensure that information required to be disclosed by us in the reports that we will file with the Securities and Exchange Commission, or SEC, is recorded, processed, summarized and reported within the time periods specified in SEC rules and forms, and that information required to be disclosed in reports under the Exchange Act is accumulated and communicated to our principal executive and financial officers. 24Table of ContentsOur current controls and any new controls that we develop may become inadequate because of changes in conditions in our business. Further, weaknesses in our internal controls may be discovered in the future. Any failure to develop or maintain effective controls, or any difficulties encountered in their implementation or improvement, could harm our operating results or cause us to fail to meet our reporting obligations and may result in a restatement of our financial statements for prior periods. Any failure to implement and maintain effective internal controls also could adversely affect the results of periodic management evaluations and annual independent registered public accounting firm attestation reports regarding the effectiveness of our internal control over financial reporting that we are required to include in our periodic reports we will file with the SEC under Section&#160;404 of the Sarbanes-Oxley Act. Ineffective disclosure controls and procedures and internal control over financial reporting could also cause investors to lose confidence in our reported financial and other information, which would likely have a negative effect on the market price of our Class&#160;A common stock. In order to maintain and improve the effectiveness of our disclosure controls and procedures and internal control over financial reporting, we have expended and anticipate that we will continue to expend significant resources, including accounting-related costs, and provide significant management oversight. Any failure to maintain the adequacy of our internal controls, or consequent inability to produce accurate financial statements on a timely basis, could increase our operating costs and could materially impair our ability to operate our business. In the event that our internal controls are perceived as inadequate or that we are unable to produce timely or accurate financial statements, investors may lose confidence in our operating results and our stock price could decline. In addition, if we are unable to continue to meet these requirements, we may not be able to remain listed on the NASDAQ Global Select Market. We are not currently required to comply with the SEC rules that implement Sections 302 and 404 of the Sarbanes-Oxley Act, and are therefore not required to make a formal assessment of the effectiveness of our internal controls over financial reporting for that purpose. We will be required to comply with certain of these rules, which will require management to certify financial and other information in our quarterly and annual reports and provide an annual management report on the effectiveness of our internal control over financial reporting commencing with our annual report on Form 10-K for the fiscal year ending July 31, 2018. To comply with the requirements of being a public company, we will need to undertake various actions, such as implementing new internal controls and procedures and hiring accounting or internal audit staff. Our independent registered public accounting firm is not required to formally attest to the effectiveness of our internal control over financial reporting until after we are no longer an emerging growth company. At such time, our independent registered public accounting firm may issue a report that is adverse in the event it is not satisfied with the level at which our controls are documented, designed or operating. Any failure to maintain effective disclosure controls and internal control over financial reporting could have a material and adverse effect on our business and operating results and could cause a decline in the price of our Class&#160;A common stock.
CONTENT_36:
Our business is subject to regulation by various federal, state, local and foreign governmental agencies, including agencies responsible for monitoring and enforcing employment and labor laws, antitrust laws, workplace safety, product safety, environmental laws, consumer protection laws, anti-bribery laws, import/export controls, federal securities laws and tax laws and regulations. In certain jurisdictions, these regulatory requirements may be more stringent than in the United States. Noncompliance with applicable regulations or requirements could subject us to investigations, sanctions, mandatory product recalls, enforcement actions, disgorgement of profits, fines, damages and civil and criminal penalties or injunctions. If any governmental sanctions are imposed, or if we do not prevail in any possible civil or criminal litigation, our business, operating results and financial condition could be adversely affected. In addition, responding to any action will likely result in a significant diversion of management&#8217;s attention and resources and an increase in third-party professional fees. Enforcement actions and sanctions could harm our business, operating results and financial condition. 25Table of ContentsIn addition, we must comply with laws and regulations relating to the formation, administration and performance of contracts with the public sector, including U.S. federal, state and local governmental organizations, which affect how we and our channel partners do business with governmental agencies. Selling our solutions to the U.S. government, whether directly or through channel partners, also subjects us to certain regulatory and contractual requirements. Failure to comply with these requirements by either us or our channel partners could subject us to investigations, fines and other penalties, which could have an adverse effect on our business, operating results, financial condition and prospects. As an example, the U.S. Department of Justice, or DOJ, and the General Services Administration, or GSA, have in the past pursued claims against and financial settlements with IT vendors under the False Claims Act and other statutes related to pricing and discount practices and compliance with certain provisions of GSA contracts for sales to the federal government. The DOJ and GSA continue to actively pursue such claims. Violations of certain regulatory and contractual requirements could also result in us being suspended or debarred from future government contracting. Any of these outcomes could have an adverse effect on our revenue, operating results, financial condition and prospects. These laws and regulations impose added costs on our business, and failure to comply with these or other applicable regulations and requirements, including non-compliance in the past, could lead to claims for damages from our channel partners, penalties, termination of contracts, loss of exclusive rights in our intellectual property, and temporary suspension or permanent debarment from government contracting. Any such damages, penalties, disruptions or limitations in our ability to do business with the public sector could have an adverse effect on our business and operating results.
CONTENT_37:
Personal privacy, data protection and information security are significant issues in the United States and the other jurisdictions where we offer our solutions. The regulatory framework for privacy and security issues worldwide is rapidly evolving and is likely to remain uncertain for the foreseeable future. Our handling of data is subject to a variety of laws and regulations, including regulation by various government agencies, including the U.S. Federal Trade Commission, or FTC, and various state, local and foreign bodies and agencies. The U.S. federal and various state and foreign governments have adopted or proposed limitations on the collection, distribution, use and storage of personal information of individuals, including end-customers and employees. In the United States, the FTC and many state attorneys general are applying federal and state consumer protection laws to the online collection, use and dissemination of data. Additionally, many foreign countries and governmental bodies, including in Australia, the European Union, India, Japan and numerous other jurisdictions in which we operate or conduct our business, have laws and regulations concerning the collection and use of personal information obtained from their residents or by businesses operating within their jurisdiction. These laws and regulations often are more restrictive than those in the United States. Such laws and regulations may require companies to implement new privacy and security policies, permit individuals to access, correct and delete personal information stored or maintained by such companies, inform individuals of security breaches that affect their personal information, and, in some cases, obtain individuals&#8217; consent to use personal information for certain purposes. In addition, a foreign government could require that any personally identifiable information collected in a country not be disseminated outside of that country, and we are not currently equipped to comply with such a requirement. &#160;&#160;&#160;&#160;26Table of ContentsWe also expect that there will continue to be new proposed laws, regulations and industry standards concerning privacy, data protection and information security in the United States, the European Union and other jurisdictions, and we cannot yet determine the impact such future laws, regulations and standards may have on our business. Additionally, we expect that existing laws, regulations and standards may be interpreted in new manners in the future. There remains significant uncertainty surrounding the regulatory framework for the future of personal data transfers from the European Union to the United States with regulations such as the recently adopted a General Data Protection Regulation, or GDPR, effective in May 2018, that will supersede current EU data protection legislation, impose more stringent EU data protection requirements, provide an enforcement authority,&#32;and impose large penalties for noncompliance. Future laws, regulations, standards and other obligations, including the adoption of the GDPR, as well as changes in the interpretation of existing laws, regulations, standards and other obligations could impair our or our customers&#8217; ability to collect, use or disclose information relating to individuals, which could decrease demand for our solutions, require us to restrict our business operations, increase our costs and impair our ability to maintain and grow our customer base and increase our revenue.Although we are working to comply with those federal, state and foreign laws and regulations, industry standards, contractual obligations and other legal obligations that apply to us, those laws, regulations, standards and obligations are evolving and may be modified, interpreted and applied in an inconsistent manner from one jurisdiction to another, and may conflict with one another, other requirements or legal obligations, our practices or the features of our solutions. As such, we cannot assure ongoing compliance with all such laws or regulations, industry standards, contractual obligations and other legal obligations. Any failure or perceived failure by us to comply with federal, state or foreign laws or regulations, industry standards, contractual obligations or other legal obligations, or any actual or suspected security incident, whether or not resulting in unauthorized access to, or acquisition, release or transfer of personal information or other data, may result in governmental enforcement actions and prosecutions, private litigation, fines and penalties or adverse publicity and could cause our customers to lose trust in us, which could have an adverse effect on our reputation and business. Any inability to adequately address privacy and security concerns, even if unfounded, or comply with applicable laws, regulations, policies, industry standards, contractual obligations or other legal obligations could result in additional cost and liability to us, damage our reputation, inhibit sales, and adversely affect our business and operating results.
CONTENT_38:
We are subject to the FCPA, the U.S. domestic bribery statute contained in 18 U.S.C. &#167; 201, the U.S. Travel Act, the USA PATRIOT Act, the United Kingdom Bribery Act of 2010, or the U.K. Bribery Act, and possibly other anti-bribery and anti-money laundering laws in countries in which we conduct activities. We face significant risks if we fail to comply with the FCPA and other anticorruption laws that prohibit companies and their employees and third-party intermediaries from authorizing, offering or providing, directly or indirectly, improper payments or benefits to foreign government officials, political parties and private-sector recipients for the purpose of obtaining or retaining business, directing business to any person or securing any advantage. In many foreign countries, particularly in countries with developing economies, it may be a local custom that businesses engage in practices that are prohibited by the FCPA or other applicable laws and regulations. In addition, we use various third parties to sell our solutions and conduct our business abroad. We or our third-party intermediaries may have direct or indirect interactions with officials and employees of government agencies or state-owned or affiliated entities and we can be held liable for the corrupt or other illegal activities of these third-party intermediaries, our employees, representatives, contractors, partners, and agents, even if we do not explicitly authorize such activities. We continue to update and implement our FCPA/anti-corruption compliance program and no assurance can be given that all of our employees and agents, as well as those companies to which we outsource certain of our business operations, will not take actions in violation of our policies and applicable law, for which we may be ultimately held responsible. Any violation of the FCPA, other applicable anticorruption laws, and anti-money laundering laws could result in whistleblower complaints, adverse media coverage, investigations, loss of export privileges, severe criminal or civil sanctions and, in the case of the FCPA, suspension or debarment from U.S. government contracts, which could have a material and adverse effect on our reputation, business, operating results and prospects. In addition, responding to any enforcement action may result in a materially significant diversion of management&#8217;s attention and resources and significant defense costs and other third-party professional fees. 27Table of Contents
CONTENT_39:
Our solutions are subject to U.S. export controls, including the Export Administration Regulations and economic sanctions administered by the Office of Foreign Assets Control, and we incorporate encryption technology into certain of our solutions. These encryption products and the underlying technology may be exported outside of the United States only with the required export authorizations, including by license, a license exception or other appropriate government authorizations, including the filing of an encryption registration. Furthermore, our activities are subject to the U.S. economic sanctions laws and regulations that prohibit the shipment of certain products and services without the required export authorizations, including to countries, governments and persons targeted by U.S. embargoes or sanctions. Additionally, the Trump administration has been critical of existing trade agreements and may impose more stringent export and import controls. Obtaining the necessary export license or other authorization for a particular sale may be time-consuming and may result in the delay or loss of sales opportunities even if the export license ultimately may be granted. While we take precautions to prevent our solutions from being exported in violation of these laws, including obtaining authorizations for our encryption products, implementing IP address blocking and screenings against U.S. government and international lists of restricted and prohibited persons, we cannot guarantee that the precautions we take will prevent violations of export control and sanctions laws. Violations of U.S. sanctions or export control laws can result in significant fines or penalties and possible incarceration for responsible employees and managers could be imposed for criminal violations of these laws. We also note that if our channel partners fail to obtain appropriate import, export or re-export licenses or permits, we may also be adversely affected, through reputational harm as well as other negative consequences including government investigations and penalties. We presently incorporate export control compliance requirements into our channel partner agreements; however, no assurance can be given that our channel partners will be able to comply with such requirements. Also, various countries, in addition to the United States, regulate the import and export of certain encryption and other technology, including import and export licensing requirements, and have enacted laws that could limit our ability to distribute our solutions or could limit our end-customers&#8217; ability to implement our solutions in those countries. Changes in our solutions or future changes in export and import regulations may create delays in the introduction of our solutions in international markets, prevent our end-customers with international operations from deploying our solutions globally or, in some cases, prevent the export or import of our solutions to certain countries, governments, or persons altogether. From time to time, various governmental agencies have proposed additional regulation of encryption technology, including the escrow and government recovery of private encryption keys. Any change in export or import regulations, economic sanctions or related legislation, increased export and import controls stemming from Trump administration policies, or change in the countries, governments, persons or technologies targeted by such regulations, could result in decreased use of our solutions by, or in our decreased ability to export or sell our solutions to, existing or potential end-customers with international operations. Any decreased use of our solutions or limitation on our ability to export or sell our solutions would adversely affect our business, operating results and prospects. 28Table of Contents
CONTENT_40:
Increasingly, we derive a significant portion of our revenue from end-customers and channel partners outside the United States. We derived approximately 33%, 37%&#32;and 40%&#32;of our total revenue from our international customers based on bill-to-location for fiscal 2015, fiscal 2016&#32;and fiscal 2017, respectively. We are continuing to adapt to and develop strategies to address international markets but there is no guarantee that such efforts will have the desired effect. As of July&#160;31, 2017, approximately 40% of our full-time employees were located outside of the United States. We expect that our international activities will continue to grow over the foreseeable future as we continue to pursue opportunities in existing and new international markets, which will require significant management attention and financial resources. We are subject to risks associated with having significant worldwide operations, including: &#8226;business practices may differ from those in the United States and may require us in the future to include terms other than our standard terms in customer, channel partner, employee, consultant and other contracts; &#8226;political, economic and social instability or uncertainty around the world;&#8226;potential changes in trade relations arising from policy initiatives implemented by, or statements made by, the Trump administration, which has been critical of existing and proposed trade agreements;&#8226;greater difficulty in enforcing contracts, judgments and arbitration awards in international courts, and in collecting accounts receivable and longer payment and collection periods; &#8226;greater risk of unexpected changes in regulatory practices, tariffs, and tax laws and treaties; &#8226;risks associated with trade restrictions and foreign legal requirements, including the importation, certification and localization of our solutions required in foreign countries; &#8226;greater risk of a failure of foreign employees, partners, distributors and resellers to comply with both U.S. and foreign laws, including antitrust regulations, the FCPA, the U.K. Bribery Act, U.S. or foreign sanctions regimes and export or import control laws, and any trade regulations ensuring fair trade practices; &#8226;heightened risk of unfair or corrupt business practices in certain geographies and of improper or fraudulent sales arrangements that may impact financial results and result in restatements of, or irregularities in, financial statements; &#8226;requirements to comply with foreign privacy, data protection and information security laws and regulations and the risks and costs of non-compliance; &#8226;reduced or uncertain protection for intellectual property rights in some countries; &#8226;impediments to the flow of foreign exchange capital payments and receipts due to exchange controls instituted by certain foreign governments; &#8226;increased expenses incurred in establishing and maintaining corporate entities, office space, and equipment for our international operations; &#8226;difficulties in managing and staffing international offices and increased travel, infrastructure and legal compliance costs associated with multiple international locations; &#8226;greater difficulty in identifying, attracting and retaining local experienced personnel, and the costs and expenses associated with such activities; &#8226;the challenge of managing a development team in geographically disparate locations; &#8226;management communication and integration problems resulting from cultural and geographic dispersion; &#8226;differing employment practices and labor relations issues; 29Table of Contents&#8226;fluctuations in exchange rates between the U.S. dollar and foreign currencies in markets where we do business; and &#8226;treatment of revenue from international sources for tax purposes and changes in tax laws, regulations or official interpretations, including being subject to foreign tax laws and being liable for paying withholding, income or other taxes in foreign jurisdictions.As we expand our business globally, our success will depend, in large part, on our ability to anticipate and effectively manage these risks. These factors and other factors could harm our ability to gain future international revenue and, consequently, materially impact our business, operating results and financial condition. The expansion of our existing international operations and entry into additional international markets will require significant management attention and financial resources. Our failure to successfully manage our international operations and the associated risks effectively could limit the future growth of our business. Additionally, failure to effectively manage this growth may result in reduced international revenue relative to U.S. revenue, and as a result, a higher effective tax rate due to the overall percentage of total revenue from U.S. customers relative to international customers.
CONTENT_41:
Certain significant components of our solutions incorporate or are based upon open source software, and we may incorporate open source software into other solutions in the future. Such open source software is generally licensed under open source licenses, including, for example, the GNU General Public License, the GNU Lesser General Public License, &#8220;Apache-style&#8221; licenses, &#8220;BSD-style&#8221; licenses and other open source licenses. The use of open source software subjects us to a number of risks and challenges, including: &#8226;If open source software programmers, most of whom we do not employ, do not continue to develop and enhance open source technologies, our development expenses could be increased and our product release and upgrade schedules could be delayed. &#8226;Open source software is open to further development or modification by anyone. As a result, others may develop such software to be competitive with our operating system, and may make such competitive software available as open source. It is also possible for competitors to develop their own solutions using open source software, potentially reducing the demand for, and putting price pressure on, our solutions. &#8226;The licenses under which we license certain types of open source software may require that, if we modify the open source software we receive, we are required to make such modified software and other related proprietary software of ours publicly available without cost and on the same terms. Accordingly, we monitor our use of open source software in an effort to avoid subjecting our proprietary software to such conditions and others we do not intend. Although we believe that we have complied with our obligations under the various applicable licenses for open source software that we use, our processes used to monitor how open source software is used could be subject to error. In addition, there is little or no legal precedent governing the interpretation of terms in most of these licenses. Therefore, any improper usage of open source could result in unanticipated obligations regarding our solutions and technologies, which could have an adverse impact on our intellectual property rights and our ability to derive revenue from solutions incorporating the open source software. &#8226;If an author or other third party that distributes such open source software were to allege that we had not complied with the conditions of one or more of these licenses, we could be required to incur legal expenses defending against such allegations, or engineering expenses in developing a substitute solution.If we are unable to successfully address the challenges of integrating offerings based upon open source technology into our business, our business and operating results may be adversely affected and our development costs may increase. 30Table of Contents
CONTENT_42:
We expect that our existing cash and cash equivalents, and short-term investments, together with the net proceeds that we received from our initial public offering, or IPO, will be sufficient to meet our anticipated cash needs for working capital and capital expenditures for at least the next 12&#160;months. We may, however, need to raise additional funds in the future, and we may not be able to obtain those funds on favorable terms, or at all. If we raise additional equity financing, our stockholders may experience significant dilution of their ownership interests and the per share value of our Class A common stock could decline. Furthermore, if we engage in debt financing, the holders of debt would have priority over the holders of our common stock, and we may be required to accept terms that restrict our ability to incur additional indebtedness. We may also be required to take other actions, any of which could harm our business and operating results. If we are unable to obtain adequate financing or financing on terms satisfactory to us, when we require it, our ability to continue to support our business growth and to respond to business challenges could be significantly limited, and our business, operating results, financial condition and prospects could be adversely affected.
CONTENT_43:
Our operations and performance depend in part on worldwide economic conditions and the impact these conditions have on levels of spending on enterprise computing technology. Our business depends on the overall demand for enterprise computing infrastructure and on the economic health and general willingness of our current and prospective end-customers to purchase our solutions. Weak economic conditions, or a reduction in enterprise computing spending, would likely adversely affect our business, operating results and financial condition in a number of ways, including by reducing sales, lengthening sales cycles and lowering prices for our solutions.
CONTENT_44:
Our sales contracts are denominated in U.S. dollars, and therefore, substantially all of our revenue is not subject to foreign currency risk. However, a strengthening of the U.S. dollar could increase the real cost of our solutions to our end-customers outside of the United States, which could adversely affect our financial condition and operating results. In addition, an increasing portion of our operating expenses is incurred outside the United States, is denominated in foreign currencies such as the Euro, the Pound&#160;Sterling, the Indian Rupee, the Canadian Dollar and the Australian Dollar, and is subject to fluctuations due to changes in foreign currency exchange rates. If we become more exposed to currency fluctuations and are not able to successfully hedge against the risks associated with currency fluctuations, our operating results could be adversely affected. To date, we have not entered into any hedging arrangements with respect to foreign currency risk or other derivative instruments.
CONTENT_45:
We do not collect sales and use, value added or similar taxes in all jurisdictions in which we have sales, and we have been advised that such taxes are not applicable to our products and services in certain jurisdictions. Sales and use, value added and similar tax laws and rates vary greatly by jurisdiction. Certain jurisdictions in which we do not collect such taxes may assert that such taxes are applicable, which could result in tax assessments, penalties and interest, to us or our end-customers for the past amounts, and we may be required to collect such taxes in the future. If we are unsuccessful in collecting such taxes from our end-customers, we could be held liable for such costs, which may adversely affect our operating results. 31Table of Contents
CONTENT_46:
We are expanding our international operations and staff to better support our growth into the international markets. Our corporate structure and associated transfer pricing policies contemplate the business flows and future growth into the international markets, and consider the functions, risks and assets of the various entities involved in the intercompany transactions.&#160;The amount of taxes we pay in different jurisdictions may depend on the application of the tax laws of the various jurisdictions, including the United States, to our international business activities, changes in tax rates, new or revised tax laws or interpretations of existing tax laws and policies and our ability to operate our business in a manner consistent with our corporate structure and intercompany arrangements. The taxing authorities of the jurisdictions in which we operate may challenge our methodologies for pricing intercompany transactions pursuant to the intercompany arrangements or disagree with our determinations as to the income and expenses attributable to specific jurisdictions. If such a challenge or disagreement were to occur, and our position was not sustained, we could be required to pay additional taxes, interest and penalties, which could result in one-time tax charges, higher effective tax rates, reduced cash flows and lower overall profitability of our operations. Our financial statements could fail to reflect adequate reserves to cover such a contingency. We expect to receive significant tax benefits from sales to our non-U.S. customers. These benefits are contingent upon existing tax laws and regulations in the U.S. and in the countries in which our international operations are located. Future changes in domestic or international tax laws and regulations could adversely affect our ability to continue to realize these tax benefits. President Trump and the U.S. Congress have called for comprehensive tax reform which, among other things, might change certain U.S. tax rules impacting the way U.S. based multinationals are taxed on foreign income. This could adversely affect our effective tax rate or result in higher tax liabilities.
CONTENT_47:
A significant natural disaster, such as an earthquake, fire, flood or significant power outage could have an adverse impact on our business and operating results. Despite the implementation of network security measures, our networks also may be vulnerable to computer viruses, break-ins and similar disruptions from unauthorized tampering with our solutions. Both our corporate headquarters and our main contract manufacturers are located in the San Francisco Bay Area, a region known for seismic activity. In addition, natural disasters, acts of terrorism or war could cause disruptions in our or our end-customers&#8217; or channel partners&#8217; businesses, our suppliers&#8217; and manufacturers&#8217; operations or the economy as a whole. We also rely on IT systems to communicate among our workforce and with third parties. Any disruption to our communications, whether caused by a natural disaster or by manmade problems, such as power disruptions, could adversely affect our business. We do not have a formal disaster recovery plan or policy in place and do not currently require that our manufacturing partners have such plans or policies in place. To the extent that any such disruptions result in delays or cancellations of orders or impede our suppliers&#8217; or our manufacturers&#8217; ability to timely deliver our solutions and product components, or the deployment of our solutions, our business, operating results and financial condition would be adversely affected. We do maintain what we believe are commercially reasonable levels of business interruption insurance. However, such insurance may not adequately cover our losses in the event of a significant disruption in our business. &#160;32Table of Contents
CONTENT_48:
We store, transmit and process our end-customers&#8217; data. If any unauthorized access to or security breach of our solutions occurs, or is believed to have occurred, such an event or perceived event could result in the loss of data, loss of intellectual property or trade secrets, loss of business, severe reputational or brand damage adversely affecting end-customer or investor confidence, regulatory investigations and orders, litigation, indemnity obligations, damages for contract breach, and penalties for violation of privacy, data protection and other applicable laws, regulations or contractual obligations. We may also be subject to significant costs for remediation that may include liability for stolen assets or information and repair of system damage that may have been caused or incentives offered to end-customers or other business partners in an effort to maintain business relationships after a breach and other liabilities. Additionally, any such event or perceived event could impact our reputation, harm customer confidence, hurt our sales and expansion into new markets or cause us to lose existing end-customers. We could be required to expend significant capital and other resources to alleviate problems caused by such actual or perceived breaches and to remediate our systems, we could be exposed to a risk of loss, litigation or regulatory action and possible liability, and our ability to operate our business may be impaired. Additionally, actual, potential or anticipated attacks may cause us to incur increasing costs, including costs to deploy additional personnel and protection technologies, train employees and engage third-party experts and consultants. Additionally, we depend upon our employees to appropriately handle confidential data and deploy our IT resources in a safe and secure fashion that does not expose our network systems, or those of our end-customers, to security breaches and the loss of data. Accordingly, if our cybersecurity systems and measures or those of our contractors, partners and vendors fail to protect against unauthorized access, sophisticated cyberattacks and the mishandling of data by our employees, contractors, partners or vendors, our business and prospects could be adversely affected. We could lose or suffer the exposure of sensitive data regarding our business, including intellectual property or other proprietary data, or personally identifiable information of our end-customers, employees and business partners; encounter disruptions in our communications systems that impair our ability to conduct our business operations; and experience degradation in our ability to process customer orders or deliver solutions, affecting our distribution channels and delaying our revenue recognition. Likewise, security vulnerabilities could be exploited or introduced into our solutions, thereby damaging the reputation and perceived reliability and security of our products and services and potentially making the data systems of our end-customers vulnerable to further data loss and cyber incidents. In addition, if the security measures of our end-customers are compromised, even without any actual compromise of our own systems or of our solutions used by such end-customers, we may face negative publicity or reputational harm if our end-customers or anyone else incorrectly attributes the blame for such security breaches to us or our solutions. If end-customers believe that our solutions do not provide adequate security for the storage of personal or other sensitive or proprietary information or the transmission of such information over the internet, our business will be harmed. End-customers&#8217; concerns about security or privacy may deter them from using our solutions for activities that involve personal or other sensitive information, which may significantly affect our business and operating results. Because the techniques used and vulnerabilities exploited to obtain unauthorized access or to sabotage systems change frequently and generally are not identified until they are launched against a target, we may be unable to anticipate these techniques or vulnerabilities or implement adequate preventative measures. We may also experience security breaches that may remain undetected for an extended period. 33Table of Contents
CONTENT_49:
Our ability to provide services and solutions to our end-customers depends on our ability to communicate with our end-customers through the public Internet and electronic networks that are owned and operated by third parties. In addition, in order to provide customer service and sales on-demand and promptly, our computer equipment and network servers must be functional 24 hours per day, which requires access to telecommunications facilities managed by third parties and the availability of electricity, which we do not control. A severe disruption of one or more of these networks, including as a result of utility or third-party system interruptions, could impair our ability to process information, which could impede our ability to provide services to our end-customers, harm our reputation, result in a loss of end-customers and adversely affect our business and operating results.
CONTENT_50:

CONTENT_51:

CONTENT_52:

CONTENT_53:

CONTENT_54:

CONTENT_55:

CONTENT_56:

CONTENT_57:

CONTENT_58:

CONTENT_59:

CONTENT_60:

CONTENT_61:

CONTENT_62:

